en: Nutriscore Grade D
xx: Nutriscore D, Nutri-Score D
ca: Grau D NutriScore
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana D
he: דירוג D ב־Nutriscore
hr: Nutriscore oznaka D
pt: Nutri-Score grau D
ro: Nutri-Score grad D

en: Nutriscore Grade E
xx: Nutriscore E, Nutri-Score E
ca: Grau E NutriScore
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana E
hr: Nutriscore oznaka E
pt: Nutri-Score grau E
ro: Nutri-Score grad E

en: Nutriscore Grade A - New calculation
xx: Nutriscore A - New calculation
bg: Nutriscore A - Ново изчисление
ca: Grau A Nutriscore - Nouveau calcul
da: Nutriscore A - Ny beregning
de: Nutriscore Note A - Neue Berechnung
es: Nutriscore A - Nuevo cálculo
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana A - Uusi laskenta
fr: Nutriscore A - Nouveau calcul
he: דירוג A ב־Nutriscore - New calculation
hr: Nutriscore oznaka A - Novi izračun
it: Nutriscore A - Nuovo calcolo
nl: Nutriscore A - Nieuwe berekening
pt: Nutri-Score grau A - Novo cálculo

en: Nutriscore Grade B - New calculation
xx: Nutriscore B - New calculation
bg: Nutriscore B - Ново изчисление
ca: Grau B Nutriscore - Nouveau calcul
da: Nutriscore B - Ny beregning
de: Nutriscore B - Neue Berechnung
es: Nutriscore B - Nuevo cálculo
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana B - Uusi laskenta
fr: Nutriscore B - Nouveau calcul
he: דירוג B ב־Nutriscore - New calculation
hr: Nutriscore oznaka B - Novi izračun
it: Nutriscore B - Nuovo calcolo
nl: Nutriscore B - Nieuwe berekening
pt: Nutri-Score grau B - Novo cálculo

en: Nutriscore Grade C - New calculation
xx: Nutriscore C - New calculation
bg: Nutriscore C - Ново изчисление
ca: Grau C Nutriscore - Nouveau calcul
da: Nutriscore C - Ny beregning
de: Nutriscore C - Neue Berechnung
es: Nutriscore C - Nuevo cálculo
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana C - Uusi laskenta
fr: Nutriscore C - Nouveau calcul
he: דירוג C ב־Nutriscore - New calculation
hr: Nutriscore oznaka C - Novi izračun
it: Nutriscore C - Nuovo calcolo
nl: Nutriscore C - Nieuwe berekening
pt: Nutri-Score grau C - Novo cálculo

en: Nutriscore Grade D - New calculation
xx: Nutriscore D - New calculation
bg: Nutriscore D - Ново изчисление
ca: Grau D NutriScore - Nouveau calcul
da: Nutriscore D - Ny beregning
de: Nutriscore D - Neue Berechnung
es: Nutriscore D - Nuevo cálculo
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana D - Uusi laskenta
fr: Nutriscore D - Nouveau calcul
he: דירוג D ב־Nutriscore - New calculation
hr: Nutriscore oznaka D - Novi izračun
it: Nutriscore D - Nuovo calcolo
nl: Nutriscore D - Nieuwe berekening
pt: Nutri-Score grau D - Novo cálculo

en: Nutriscore Grade E - New calculation
xx: Nutriscore E - New calculation
bg: Nutriscore E - Ново изчисление
ca: Grau E NutriScore - Nouveau calcul
da: Nutriscore E - Ny beregning
de: Nutriscore Note E - Neue Berechnung
es: Nutriscore E - Nuevo cálculo
fi: Nutriscore-arvosana E - Uusi laskenta
fr: Nutriscore E - Nouveau calcul
hr: Nutriscore oznaka E - Novi izračun
it: Nutriscore E - Nuovo calcolo
nl: Nutriscore E - Nieuwe berekening
pt: Nutri-Score grau E - Novo cálculo

en: Nutri-Score A/B
xx: Nutri-Score A/B

en: Nutri-Score A/C
xx: Nutri-Score A/C

en: Nutri-Score A/D
xx: Nutri-Score A/D

en: Nutri-Score A/E
xx: Nutri-Score A/E

en: Nutri-Score B/C
xx: Nutri-Score B/C

en: Nutri-Score B/D
xx: Nutri-Score B/D

en: Nutri-Score B/E
xx: Nutri-Score B/E

en: Nutri-Score C/D
xx: Nutri-Score C/D

en: Nutri-Score C/E
xx: Nutri-Score C/E

en: Nutri-Score D/E
xx: Nutri-Score D/E

en: Health Star Rating, Health Star Rating System, HSR
xx: Health Star Rating, Health Star Rating System, HSR

en: Health Star Rating 0.5
xx: Health Star Rating 0.5

en: Health Star Rating 1
xx: Health Star Rating 1